el: Συμβατός τύπος ιμάντα κίνησης σπείρας: Διπλής κίνησης; Ιρλανδική τάση (flyer-led); Πολλαπλά συστήματα (γενικής χρήσης); Σκωτσέζικη τάση (bobbin-led); Σύστημα μεταβλητής ταχύτητας/επιταχυντή; Άλλο
pt-BR: Tipo de correia de acionamento da polia compatível: Tração dupla; Tensão irlandesa (guiada pelo fuso); Múltiplos sistemas (universal); Tensão escocesa (guiada pela bobina); Velocidade variável/sistema acelerador; Outro
zh-CN: 适用的轮式驱动带类型: 双驱动; 爱尔兰张力系统（锭翼主导）; 多种系统（通用）; 苏格兰张力系统（筒管主导）; 变速/加速系统; 其他
tr: Uyumlu çıkrık makarası tahrik kayışı tipi: Çift tahrikli; İrlanda tansiyonu (kelebek tahrikli); Çoklu sistemler (evrensel); İskoç tansiyonu (masura tahrikli); Değişken hızlı/hızlandırıcı sistem; Diğer
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ hnacieho pásu vretena: Dvojitý pohon; Írske napínanie (ťahané krídlom); Viacero systémov (univerzálne); Škótske napínanie (ťahané cievkou); Systém s premenlivou rýchlosťou/akcelerátorom; Iné
th: ประเภทของสายพานขับเคลื่อนและล้อหมุนที่รองรับการใช้งานร่วมกัน: ขับเคลื่อนคู่; แรงดึงแบบไอริช (นำด้วยปีก); หลายระบบ (อเนกประสงค์); แรงดึงแบบสกอตช์ (นำด้วยหลอดด้าย); ระบบปรับความเร็ว/เร่งความเร็ว; อื่นๆ
fr: Type de courroie d’entraînement de poulie compatible: Double entraînement; Tension irlandaise (entraînement par l'épinglier); Systèmes multiples (universel); Tension écossaise (entraînement par la bobine); Système à vitesse variable/accélérateur; Autre
en: Compatible whorl drive band type: Double drive; Irish tension (flyer-led); Multiple systems (universal); Scotch tension (bobbin-led); Variable-speed/accelerator system; Other
ja: 互換性のあるホイールドライブバンドタイプ: ダブルドライブ; アイリッシュテンション (フライヤードライブ); 複数システム (ユニバーサル); スコッチテンション (ボビンドライブ); 可変速/アクセラレーターシステム; その他
nl: Compatibel type aandrijfsnaar voor whorl: Dubbele aandrijving; Ierse spanning (vleugelgeremd); Meerdere systemen (universeel); Schotse spanning (spoelgeremd); Systeem met variabele snelheid/versneller; Overige
bg-BG: Съвместим тип ремък за предачно колело: Двойно задвижване; Ирландско обтягане (водене от крилцето); Множество системи (универсална); Шотландско обтягане (водене от калерчето); Система с променлива скорост/ускорител; Друг
zh-TW: 相容的紡車皮帶輪傳動帶類型: 雙驅動; 愛爾蘭張力 (帶動翼); 多系統 (通用); 蘇格蘭張力 (線軸帶動); 變速/加速器系統; 其他
da: Kompatibel drivremtype til spindehjul: Dobbelttræk; Irsk bremse (vingestyret); Flere systemer (universal); Skotsk bremse (spolestyret); Variabel hastighed/acceleratorsystem; Andet
pl: Kompatybilny typ pasa napędowego krążka: Napęd podwójny; Naciąg irlandzki (z napędem na skrzydełko); Wiele systemów (uniwersalne); Naciąg szkocki (z napędem na szpulę); System o zmiennej prędkości / akcelerator; Inne
hr-HR: Kompatibilni tip pogonskog remena sa spiralnim pogonom: Dvostruki pogon; Irska napetost (vuča na letak); Višestruki sustavi (univerzalno); Škotska napetost (vuča na vreteno); Sustav varijabilne brzine / akceleratora; Ostalo
lt-LT: Suderinamas verpimo ratelio pavaros diržo tipas: Dviguba pavara; Airiškas įtempimas (vedamas skrajutės); Kelios sistemos (universali); Škotiškas įtempimas (vedamas ritės); Kintamo greičio / greitintuvo sistema; Kita
it: Tipo di fascia di trasmissione compatibile: Doppia trazione; Tensione irlandese (trazione sull'aletta); Sistemi multipli (universale); Tensione scozzese (trazione sulla bobina); Sistema a velocità variabile/acceleratore; Altro
fi: Yhteensopiva rukinlyhdyn vetohihnatyyppi: Kaksoisveto; Irlantilainen jarru (lyhtyvetoinen); Useita järjestelmiä (universaali); Skotlantilainen jarru (rullavetoinen); Säädettävä nopeus / kiihdytinjärjestelmä; Muu
sv: Kompatibel virveldrivband: Dubbel remdrift; Irländsk broms (vingdriven); Flera system (universell); Skotsk broms (spoldriven); System för variabel hastighet/accelerator; Övrigt
hu: Csigával kompatibilis hajtószíjtípus: Kettős meghajtás; Ír fék (szárnyvezérelt); Többféle rendszer (univerzális); Skót fék (orsóvezérelt); Változtatható sebességű/gyorsító rendszer; Egyéb
vi: Loại dây đai truyền động bánh xe tương thích: Dẫn động kép; Lực căng kiểu Ireland (dẫn động bằng trục quay); Nhiều hệ thống (đa năng); Lực căng kiểu Scotland (dẫn động bằng lõi sợi); Hệ thống tăng tốc/có tốc độ tùy biến; Khác
ru: Совместимый тип приводного ремня шкива: Двойной привод; Ирландское натяжение (с ведущей рогулькой); Несколько систем (универсальный); Шотландское натяжение (с ведущей катушкой); Система регулировки скорости / ускоритель; Другое
es: Tipo de banda de transmisión compatible para el torno: Doble transmisión; Tensión irlandesa (guiada por el volante); Sistemas múltiples (universal); Tensión escocesa (guiada por la bobina); Sistema de velocidad variable/acelerador; Otro
cs: Kompatibilní typ hnacího řemínku whorlíku: Dvojitý pohon; Irské napínání (tažené křídlem); Několik systémů (univerzální); Skotské napínání (tažené cívkou); Systém s proměnnou rychlostí / akcelerátorem; Jiné
pt-PT: Tipo de banda de acionamento helicoidal compatível: Acionamento duplo; Tensão irlandesa (acionamento por fuso); Vários sistemas (universal); Tensão escocesa (acionamento por bobine); Sistema de velocidade variável/acelerador; Outro
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta pogonskega traku vretena: Dvojni pogon; Irska napetost (vlečenje preko krilca); Več sistemov (univerzalno); Škotska napetost (vlečenje preko tuljave); Sistem s spremenljivo hitrostjo/pospeševalnikom; Drugo
ro-RO: Tip de bandă de acționare cu spirală compatibilă: Transmisie dublă; Tensiune irlandeză (condusă de fluturaș); Sisteme multiple (universal); Tensiune scoțiană (condusă de bobină); Sistem cu viteză variabilă/accelerator; Altele
de: Kompatibler Spinnrad-Antriebsbandtyp: Zweifädiger Antrieb (Double drive); Irische Bremse (flügelgetrieben); Mehrere Systeme (universal); Schottische Bremse (spulengetrieben); Variable Geschwindigkeit / Beschleunigersystem; Sonstige
nb: Kompatibel type virveldrev: Dobbelt snordrift; Vingebrems (flyer-ledet); Flere systemer (universell); Spolebrems (spoledrevet); System for variabel hastighet / akselerator; Annet
ko: 호환 플라이어 바퀴 드라이브 밴드 유형: 더블 드라이브; 아이리시 텐션(플라이어 리드); 다중 시스템(범용); 스코치 텐션(보빈 리드); 가변 속도/가속기 시스템; 기타